Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 7. Claims Against Estate
§ 2-7-715.
Adjudication of propriety in handling claims prior to final report.

At any time the personal representative may file an application with the court for an adjudication binding upon all distributees as to the propriety of the personal representative’s past or proposed allowance or rejection of any or all claims. Upon such filing the court shall order a hearing. Notice shall be served by the personal representative on each distributee by certified mail not less than twenty (20) days before the date set for hearing. Upon the hearing, an adjudication shall be rendered which is final and binding upon all distributees served with notice and shall not be questioned upon hearing on the final report and accounting.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-7-716.
Stay of probate proceedings pending final disposition of claims and litigation.

Pending final adjudication of all claims and litigation as to which claims have been timely filed, the personal representative shall proceed with the administration of the estate to the extent possible without prejudicing the possible rights of creditors, but the estate shall not be closed and no payment of claims or distributions to distributees shall be made which would impair the ability of the estate to honor the claims as finally adjudicated, in accordance with their priority. The personal representative may obtain extensions of time in which to file tax returns and pay taxes, and incur interest charges with respect to the payment of those taxes, until all claims, the payment of which would affect the amount of the taxes due, and litigation is adjudicated.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Quoted

in

Rodriguez v. Casey, 2002 WY 111, 50 P.3d 323,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 2-7-717.
Action precluded until claim rejected; exception.

No holder of any claim against an estate shall maintain any action thereon unless the claim is first rejected in whole or in part by the personal representative and the rejection filed with the clerk, except an action may be brought by any holder of a mortgage or lien, including liens under W.S.

42-4-207

, to enforce the same against the property of the estate subject thereto where all recourse against the other property of the estate is expressly waived in the complaint or no claim for deficiency is made in proceedings for foreclosure by advertisement and sale under W.S.

34-4-101

through

34-4-113

.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 14, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 4755; C.S. 1910, § 5624; C.S. 1920, § 6895; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 137; R.S. 1931, § 88-3109; C.S. 1945, § 6-1609; Laws 1947, ch. 4, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 2-227; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-209

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 39, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to failure to timely file claim as constituting a bar, see §

2-7-703

.

Effect of section. —

This section, requiring holder of claim against an estate to present same to executor or administrator before bringing action thereon, and §

2-7-703

, requiring all claims whether due, not due or contingent, to be filed within time limited in the notice or be forever barred, refer to same thing, “barred” applying to an action. Dallas Dome Wyoming Oil Fields Co. v. Brooder, 55 Wyo. 109, 97 P.2d 311,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1939).

Where the alleged tortfeasor dies prior to a wrongful death claimant filing his or her lawsuit, and the two-year period provided for under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-38-102(d) will expire before the period for rejection of claims provided for under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 2-7-712(a) expires, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

2-7-717

allows the holder of the wrongful death claim to bring his or her civil action and serve the alleged tortfeasor's personal representative before the claim has been filed and rejected in the probate estate. Rodriguez v. Casey, 2002 WY 111, 50 P.3d 323,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2002).

Counterclaim not deemed barred. —

Under §

1-1-106

, providing that when cross-demands have existed between two persons, so that if one had brought an action the other could have set up a counterclaim, neither can be deprived of the benefit thereof through assignment by, or death of the other, but the two demands must be deemed compensated so far as they equal each other, counterclaim may be set up even if not presented to executor or administrator under this section. Dallas Dome Wyoming Oil Fields Co. v. Brooder, 55 Wyo. 109, 97 P.2d 311,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1939).

Mortgagee need not present claim. —

Where husband and wife executed mortgage before husband's death, and wife thereafter claimed homestead, which was not divisible and worth over statutory homestead amount, mortgage holder was not required to present claim to widow as executrix. Delfelder v. Teton Land & Inv. Co., 46 Wyo. 142, 24 P.2d 702,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 46 Wyo. 142, 26 P.2d 153,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1933).

Presenting note does not bar foreclosure action. —

Presentation to and allowance by the personal representatives of a deceased mortgagor of a claim founded upon the note which the mortgage secured does not bar the right to proceed on the mortgage by a foreclosure action. Bank of Commerce v. Williams, 52 Wyo. 1, 69 P.2d 525,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1937).

Mortgagee need not present claim for deficiency if originalclaim rejected. —

Mortgagee whose claim against deceased mortgagor's estate was rejected was entitled to bring an action against estate for deficiency remaining unpaid after application of proceeds of sale of mortgaged property pursuant to power of sale to a reduction of the debt, notwithstanding no claim for amount of deficiency was ever presented to representative of mortgagor's estate. Denver Joint Stock Land Bank v. Preston, 52 Wyo. 132, 70 P.2d 584,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1937).

Administrator may avoid chattel mortgage though no claim filed.—

An administrator may avoid a chattel mortgage, as representative of creditors, even though claim had not been filed at commencement of action. First Nat'l Bank v. Ludvigsen, 8 Wyo. 230, 56 P. 994,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 8 Wyo. 230, 57 P. 934,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1899).

Action to recover amount greater than specified in claim. —

A creditor can recover an amount greater than specified in its claim against an estate where the original claim reserves the right to amend the claim from time to time, said reservation is reasonable due to confused records of the parties and deaths of material witnesses, and the claimant moves at trial to amend the claim and the defendant is not prejudiced thereby. Yost v. Harpel Oil Co., 674 P.2d 712,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 392

(Wyo. 1983).

Attorney fees should not be allowed on foreclosure of mortgage on deceased partner's homestead

until it is proven that property was in fact partnership property. State Bank v. Bagley Bros., 44 Wyo. 244, 11 P.2d 572,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 44 Wyo. 456, 13 P.2d 564,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1932).

Applied

in

State ex rel. State Bd. of Charities & Reform v. Bower, 362 P.2d 814,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1961); Lo Sasso v. Braun, 386 P.2d 630,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1963); In re Estate of Baker, 483 P.2d 513,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1971); Ivinson Mem. Hosp. v. Swindler, 828 P.2d 1190,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

Lindsay v. Collins, 96 F. Supp. 994, 1951 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2554 (D. Wyo. 1951); In re Estate of Peterson, 75 Wyo. 416, 296 P.2d 504,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1956); Scott v. Scott, 918 P.2d 198,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1996); Beit Hanina Enters. v. Moffett (in re Estate of Andrew), 2011 WY 165, 267 P.3d 1070,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Dec. 20, 2011); Beit Hanina Enters. v. Moffett (in re Estate of Andrew), 2011 WY 165, 267 P.3d 1070,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Dec. 20, 2011).

Cited

in

O'Keefe v. Foster, 5 Wyo. 343, 40 P. 525,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(1895); Delfelder v. Farmers' State Bank, 38 Wyo. 481, 269 P. 418,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(1928); In re Estate of Gibbs, 73 Wyo. 425, 280 P.2d 556,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1955); V-1 Oil Co. v. Ranck, 767 P.2d 612,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-7-718.
Action on rejected claim; limitations.

When a claim is rejected and notice given as required, the holder shall bring suit in the proper court against the personal representative within thirty (30) days after the date of mailing the notice, otherwise the claim is forever barred.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 14, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 4753; C.S. 1910, § 5622; C.S. 1920, § 6893; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 136; R.S. 1931, § 88-3107; C.S. 1945, § 6-1607; W.S. 1957, § 2-225; W.S. 1977, §

2-6-207

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

In general. —

Cases within the reason, but not within the words, of a statute of limitations are not barred but may be considered as omitted cases which legislature has not deemed proper to limit. Roberts v. Roberts, 62 Wyo. 77, 162 P.2d 117,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1945).

Creditor's first claim was timely filed under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 2-7-703(a) and then was properly rejected by the estate, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

2-7-718

; the creditor's sole and exclusive remedy was to comply with §

2-7-718

and bring suit in a proper court against the estate within 30 days, which it failed to do and its claim was time barred.
Beit Hanina Enters. v. Moffett (In re Estate of Andrew), 2011 WY 165, 267 P.3d 1070,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 2011).

Section does not apply to executor's or administrator's claim

rejected by a judge. Roberts v. Roberts, 62 Wyo. 77, 162 P.2d 117,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1945).

Until successor appointed. —

See Roberts v. Roberts, 62 Wyo. 77, 162 P.2d 117,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1945).

Conditions precedent must be fulfilled. —

Husband's personal injury claim against wife's estate was not time-barred, where personal representative failed to strictly comply with notice requirements of code, and therefore conditions precedent to husband's filing of claim were not triggered. Harris v. Taylor, 969 P.2d 142,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1998).

Stay of Wyoming proceedings was ordered pending outcome of similar suit in Utah,

where, although both state courts were “proper courts” under this section, a trial in Utah, where the court had subject matter jurisdiction over the action and personal jurisdiction over all the defendants, was more efficient. V-1 Oil Co. v. Ranck, 767 P.2d 612,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1989).

Failure to fulfill the requirements of § 2-7-712(a),

assuming no estoppel is present, merely prevents the triggering of this section and the running of the 30-day period in which a suit must be filed for the rejected claim.
Zmijewski v. Wright, 809 P.2d 280,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1991).

Period runs from mailing of rejection. —

Where defendant succeeded plaintiff as administratrix of estate, appointment, for purposes of limitation, automatically changed character of plaintiff's claim against estate, but limitation period did not commence to run on plaintiff's claim as ordinary creditor until date of mailing of notice of rejection by defendant. Roberts v. Roberts, 62 Wyo. 77, 162 P.2d 117,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1945).

Judicial action not barred where rejection notice not given by certified mail. —

Where notice of a rejected claim is not given by certified mail as required by § 2-7-712(d), the 30-day period prescribed by this section does not begin to run and a subsequent judicial action is not barred. Hanson v. Estate of Belden, 668 P.2d 1331,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 358

(Wyo. 1983).

Action by former administrator held commenced in time. —

Action commenced by former administratrix less than three months (now 30 days) after rejection of claim by successor administrator was timely notwithstanding probate judge had rejected claim while claimant was serving as administratrix. Roberts v. Roberts, 62 Wyo. 77, 162 P.2d 117,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1945).

Objection where action not commenced in time. —

Where it affirmatively appears on face of petition that action was not commenced within three months (now 30 days) after rejection of claim, as required by this section, objection may be raised by demurrer (now motion to dismiss). Columbia Sav. & Loan Ass'n v. Clause, 13 Wyo. 166, 78 P. 708,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1904).

Filing of claim not deemed commencement of action. —

Filing of claim against an estate is in the nature of a demand, a condition precedent to commencement of an action, and does not constitute commencement of an action so as to preclude foreclosure of mortgage under a power of sale contained therein. Denver Joint Stock Land Bank v. Preston, 52 Wyo. 132, 70 P.2d 584,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1937).

Insufficient petition cured by answer filed after period. —

Insufficiency of petition against estate for funeral expenses in failing to allege that expenses were reasonable was cured by allegations of answer, notwithstanding answer was filed after expiration of three months (now 30 days) limitation for commencing an action. Sowers v. King, 32 Wyo. 167, 231 P. 411,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 32 Wyo. 167, 238 P. 540,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 1924).

Applied

in

Roberts v. Roberts, 64 Wyo. 433, 196 P.2d 361,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1948);
Noyes v. First Nat'l Bank, 589 P.2d 384,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 350

(Wyo. 1979);
Ivinson Mem. Hosp. v. Swindler, 828 P.2d 1190,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1992);
State ex rel. Dep't of Health v. Campbell, 950 P.2d 557,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1997).

Receipt of constitutionally adequate notice. —

District court properly granted an estate's motion to dismiss a creditor's complaint as untimely because, while the certified mailing to the creditor was not constitutionally adequate notice, the estate strictly complied with the statutory notice requirements by filing the notice of rejection in district court and mailing the rejection notice to the creditor via certified mail, and the creditor failed to timely file its complaint after receiving constitutionally adequate notice of the estate's claim rejection. Accelerated Receivable Solutions v. Hauf, 2015 WY 71, 350 P.3d 731,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2015).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes rejection of claim against estate to commence running of statute of limitations applicable to rejected claims, 36 ALR4th 684.

§ 2-7-719.
Certified copy of judgments to be filed; effect thereof.

A certified copy of any judgment rendered as contemplated by W.S.

2-7-709

,

2-7-710

,

2-7-711

or

2-7-717

shall be filed upon its rendition with the clerk.

Any judgment rendered upon any claim for money only establishes the claim as if it had been allowed by the personal representative. The judgment shall be that the personal representative pay, to the extent of assets available to satisfy claims of that class augmented by any liability insurance proceeds available as to the claim, in due course of administration the amount ascertained to be due. No execution shall issue upon the judgment, nor shall it create any lien upon the property of the estate or give to the judgment creditor any priority of payment.

If judgment is for the recovery of real or personal property or the enforcement of a lien thereon, no execution shall issue until ten (10) days after a certified copy of the judgment has been filed pursuant to W.S. 2-7-719(a).

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Applied

in

Ivinson Mem. Hosp. v. Swindler, 828 P.2d 1190,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 2-7-720.
Short title; citation.

This act may be cited as the “Disposition of Community Property Rights at Death Act”.

As used in W.S.

2-7-720

through

2-7-729

“this act” means W.S.

2-7-720

through

2-7-729

.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 16, § 1.

§ 2-7-721.
Application of act.

This act applies to the disposition at death of the following property acquired by a married person:

All personal property, wherever situated which was acquired as or became, and remained, community property under the laws of another jurisdiction, and:

All or the proportionate part of any property acquired with the rents, issues or income of, or the proceeds from, or in exchange for, that community property; or

Any property otherwise traceable to that community property.

All or the proportionate part of any real property situated in this state which was acquired with the rents, issues or income of, the proceeds from, or in exchange for, property acquired as or which became, and remained, community property under the laws of another jurisdiction, or property traceable to that community property.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 16, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 2-7-720(b).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 2-7-722.
Presumptions as to applicability of act.

In determining whether this act applies to specific property the following rebuttable presumptions apply:

Property acquired during marriage by a spouse of that marriage while domiciled in a jurisdiction under the laws of which property could then be acquired as community property, is presumed to have been acquired as or to have become and remained property to which this act applies; and

Real property situated in this state and personal property wherever situated acquired by a married person while domiciled in a jurisdiction under the laws of which property could not then be acquired as community property, title to which was taken in a form which created rights of survivorship, is presumed not to be property to which this act applies.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 16, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 2-7-720(b).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 2-7-723.
Distribution of property upon death of a married person.

Upon death of a married person, one-half (1/2) of the property to which this act applies is the property of the surviving spouse and is not subject to testamentary disposition by the decedent or distribution under the laws of succession of this state. One-half (1/2) of that property is the property of the decedent and is subject to testamentary disposition or distribution under the laws of succession of this state. With respect to property to which this act applies, the one-half (1/2) of the property which is the property of the decedent is not subject to the surviving spouse’s right to elect against the will.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 16, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 2-7-720(b).

§ 2-7-724.
Claim to community property; perfection of title in surviving spouse.

If the title to any property to which this act applies was held by the decedent at the time of death, title of the surviving spouse may be perfected by an order of the court or by execution of an instrument by the personal representative with the approval of the court. Neither the personal representative nor the court in which the decedent’s estate is being administered has a duty to discover or attempt to discover whether property held by the decedent is property to which this act applies.

If the surviving spouse or the spouse’s successor in interest claims that there is any property to which this section applies, then a claim in writing with respect thereto shall be filed in duplicate with the clerk of court within the time limited in the notice to creditors and any such claim not so filed is barred forever.

When such a claim is so filed, the personal representative shall proceed as provided in W.S. 2-7-712(a) and (d), and if such claim is rejected, the provisions of W.S.

2-7-717

and

2-7-718

will apply.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 16, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 2-7-720(b).

§ 2-7-725.
Claim to community property; perfection of title to decedent's interest in community property.

If the title to any property to which this act applies is held by the surviving spouse at the time of the decedent’s death, the personal representative or an heir or devisee of the decedent may institute an action to perfect title to the property. The personal representative has no fiduciary duty to discover or attempt to discover whether any property held by the surviving spouse is property to which this act applies unless a written demand is made by an heir, devisee or creditor of the decedent.

If an heir, devisee or creditor of the decedent claims that there is any property to which this section applies, the party shall file a written demand in duplicate with the clerk of court within the time limited in the notice to creditors, demanding that the personal representative investigate such matter and report thereon to the court. Any demand not filed within the time limited shall be forever barred, and all claims and causes of action arising out of such demand shall likewise be forever barred.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 16, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 2-7-720(b).

§ 2-7-726.
Rights of a purchaser for value; duty to inquire; rights to proceeds from sale or security interest.

If a surviving spouse has apparent title to property to which this act applies, a purchaser for value or a lender taking a security interest in the property takes his interest in the property free of any rights of the personal representative or an heir or devisee of the decedent.

If a personal representative or an heir or devisee of the decedent has apparent title to property to which this act applies, a purchaser for value or a lender taking a security interest in the property takes his interest in the property free of any rights of the surviving spouse.

A purchaser for value or a lender need not inquire whether a vendor or borrower acted properly.

The proceeds of a sale or creation of a security interest shall be treated in the same manner as the property transferred to the purchaser for value or a lender.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 16, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 2-7-720(b).

§ 2-7-727.
Rights of creditors not affected.

This act does not affect rights of creditors with respect to property to which this act applies.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 16, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 2-7-720(b).

§ 2-7-728.
Rights of spouses to alter interests in community property.

This act does not prevent married persons from severing or altering their interests in property to which this act applies.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 16, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 2-7-720(b).

§ 2-7-729.
Testamentary disposition limited.

This act does not authorize a person to dispose of property by will if it is held under limitations imposed by law preventing testamentary disposition by that person.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 16, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 2-7-720(b).